District of Columbia statutes.
21-2401.03

International application of chapter.

The Superior Court may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this subchapter and Subchapters II, III, and V [of this chapter].

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 103 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.